North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 5. Tuberculosis.

§ 106-336.
Animals reacting to tuberculin test.

All animals reacting to a tuberculin test applied by a qualified veterinarian shall be known as reactors and be forever considered as affected with tuberculosis.

History.

1921, c. 177, s. 1; C.S., s. 4895(a).

§ 106-337.
Animals to be branded.

All veterinarians who, either by clinical examination or by tuberculin test, find an animal affected with tuberculosis, shall, unless the animal is immediately slaughtered, properly brand said animal for identification on the left jaw with the letter “T,” not less than two inches high, and promptly report the same to the State Veterinarian.

History.

1921, c. 177, s. 2; C.S., s. 4895(b).

§ 106-338.
Quarantine; removal or sale; sale and use of milk.

The owner or owners of an animal affected with tuberculosis shall keep said animal isolated and quarantined in such a manner as to prevent the spread of the disease to the other animals or man. Said animals must not be moved from the place where quarantined or sold, or otherwise disposed of except upon permission of the State Veterinarian, and then only in accordance with his instructions. The milk from said animals must not be sold, and if used shall be first boiled or properly pasteurized.

History.

1921, c. 177, s. 3; C.S., s. 4895(c).

§ 106-339.
Seller liable in civil action.

Any person or persons who sell or otherwise dispose of to another an animal affected with tuberculosis shall be liable in a civil action to any person injured, and for any and all damages resulting therefrom.

History.

1921, c. 177, s. 4; C.S., s. 4895(d).

Cross References.

For similar section regarding animals affected with brucellosis, see

G.S. 106-391

.

As to disposition of dead domesticated animals, see

G.S. 106-403

.

As to killing of animals affected with glanders, see

G.S. 106-404

.

§ 106-340.
Responsibility of owner of premises where sale is made.

When cattle are sold or otherwise disposed of in this State by a nonresident of this State, the person or persons on whose premises the cattle are sold or otherwise disposed of with his knowledge and consent shall be equally responsible for violation of this law and the regulations of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

History.

1921, c. 177, s. 5; C.S., s. 4895(e); 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-341.
Sale of tuberculin.

No person, firm, or corporation shall sell or distribute or administer tuberculin, or keep the same on hand for sale, distribution, or administration, except qualified veterinarians, licensed physicians, or licensed druggists, or others lawfully engaged in the sale of biological products.

History.

1921, c. 177, s. 6; C.S., s. 4895(f).

§ 106-342.
Notice to owner of suspected animals; quarantine.

When the State Veterinarian receives information, or has reason to believe, that tuberculosis exists in any animal or animals, he shall promptly notify the owner or owners, and recommend that a tuberculin test be applied to said animals, that diseased animals shall be properly disposed of, and the premises disinfected under the supervision of the State Veterinarian, or his authorized representative. Should the owner or owners fail or refuse to comply with the said recommendations of the State Veterinarian within 10 days after said notice, then the State Veterinarian shall quarantine said animals on the premises of the owner or owners. Said animals shall not be removed from the premises where quarantined and milk or other dairy products from same shall not be sold or otherwise disposed of. Said quarantine shall remain in effect until the said recommendations of the State Veterinarian have been complied with, and the quarantine canceled by the State Veterinarian.

History.

1921, c. 177, s. 7; C.S., s. 4895(g).

§ 106-343.
Appropriations by counties; elections.

The several boards of county commissioners in the State are hereby expressly authorized and empowered to make such appropriations from the general funds of their county as will enable them to cooperate effectively with the state Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services and Federal Department of Agriculture in the eradication of tuberculosis in their respective counties: Provided, that if in 10 days after said appropriation is voted, one fifth of the qualified voters of the county petition the board of commissioners to submit the question of tuberculosis eradication or no tuberculosis eradication to the voters of the county, said commissioners shall submit such questions to said voters. Said election shall be held and conducted under

G.S. 163-287

. If at any such election a majority of the votes cast shall be in favor of said tuberculosis eradication, the said board shall record the result of the election upon its minutes, and cooperative tuberculosis eradication shall be taken up with the state Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services and Federal Department of Agriculture. If, however, a majority of the votes cast shall be adverse, then said board shall make no appropriation.

History.

1921, c. 177, s. 8; C.S., s. 4895(h); 1997-261, s. 109; 2013-381, s. 10.15; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “G.S. 163A-1592” for “G.S. 163-287” in this section.

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1 repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the change to the reference.

§ 106-344.
Petition for election if commissioners refuse cooperation; order; effect.

If the board of commissioners of any county should exercise their discretion and refuse to cooperate as set out in

G.S. 106-343

, then if a petition is presented to said board by one fifth of the qualified voters of the county requesting that an election be held as provided in

G.S. 106-343

to determine the question of tuberculosis eradication in the county, the board of commissioners shall order said election to be held in the way provided in G.S. 106-343, and if a majority of the votes cast at such election shall be in favor of tuberculosis eradication, then said board shall cooperate with the State and federal governments as herein provided.

History.

1921, c. 177, s. 9; C.S., s. 4895(i).

§ 106-345.
Importation of cattle.

Whenever a county board shall cooperate with the State and federal governments, whether with or without an election, no cattle except for immediate slaughter shall be brought into the county unless accompanied by a tuberculin test chart and health certificate issued by a qualified veterinarian.

History.

1921, c. 177, s. 10; C.S., s. 4895(j).

§ 106-346.
Amount of appropriation.

When cooperative tuberculosis eradication shall be taken up in any county as provided for in

G.S. 106-336

to 106-350, the county commissioners of such counties shall appropriate from the general county fund an amount sufficient to defray one half of the expense of said cooperative tuberculosis eradication.

History.

1921, c. 177, s. 11; C.S., s. 4895(k).

§ 106-347.
Qualified veterinarian.

The words “qualified veterinarian” which appear in

G.S. 106-336

to 106-350 shall be construed to mean a veterinarian approved by the State Veterinarian and the chief of the United States Bureau of Animal Industry for the tuberculin testing of cattle intended for interstate shipment.

History.

1921, c. 177, s. 12; C.S., s. 4895(l).

§ 106-348.
Rules and regulations.

The Commissioner of Agriculture, by and with the consent of the State Board of Agriculture, shall have full power to promulgate and enforce such rules and regulations as may be necessary to control and eradicate tuberculosis.

History.

1921, c. 177, s. 13; C.S., s. 4895(m).

§ 106-349.
Violation of law a misdemeanor.

Any person or persons who shall violate any provision set forth in

G.S. 106-336

to 106-350, or any rule or regulation duly established by the State Board of Agriculture or any officer or inspector who shall willfully fail to comply with any provisions of this law, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1921, c. 177, s. 14; C.S., s. 4895(n); 1993, c. 539, s. 770; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 106-350.
Sale of tubercular animal a felony.

Any person or persons who shall willfully and knowingly sell or otherwise dispose of any animal or animals known to be affected with tuberculosis without permission as provided for in

G.S. 106-338

shall be guilty of a Class I felony.

History.

1921, c. 177, s. 15; C.S., s. 4895(o); 1993, c. 539, s. 1295; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).